pg2p.foma
# Copyright (C) 2024-2026  Mateo Cedillo <angelitomateocedillo@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# Spanish Post g2p with documentation. Important things to consider:

# Phrase Boundary.
define PB %- | .#. ; 
# Word boundary (words of the utterance)
define WB %# | PB ; 

source include/phon/stress.foma

define SpanishStressPost stresses @-> || 
# 1. Well stress these "uns" tagged words when they are alone, that means, when the utterance contains only the word, as well as at the end. Our stress.foma is our colleague during this pipeline, that's because we included it before. Else, if the word from the wordlist is not alone, is an unstressed word.
WB (Consonant+) _ (Consonant+) [Uns|Con] PB , 
WB noStress* _ Consonant* UnstressedVowel (n|s) Uns PB ; 

define ConnectorExceptions 
# Single connector exceptions #
# According to Spanish ortografy and grammar, here are the following things:
# when the connector "u" is preceded by "o" at the start of the next word, is a valid connector. Otherwise, stress "u".
# Example: plata u oro
[u0:u1 Con] @-> || WB _ %# \[o0|o1] ,, 
# when the connector "e" is preceded by "i" at the start of the next word, is a valid connector. Otherwise, stress "i".
# Example: padres e hijos
[e0:e1 Con] @-> || WB _ %# \[i0|i1] ,, 
# Multi-word exceptions#
# Pese a...
[p e1 s e0]:[p e0 s e0] @-> || [.#.|%-] _ IVrbS %# a0 Con %# PhWord+ ,, 
# Puesto (a) que...
[p w e1 s t o0]:[p w e0 s t o0] @-> || [.#.|%-] _ (%# a0 Con) %# k e0 Uns2 WB ,, 
# Salvo en...
[s a1 l v o0]:[s a0 l v o0] @-> || [.#.|%-] _ %# e0 n Uns %# PhWord ; 

define Unstress2 
# 2. After applying Spanish stressing rules and regulations in these tagged words alone in the utterance, we don't need this tag anymore.
[Uns|Uns2|Con|Past|pos|IVrbS|IVrbP] @-> 0 || _ ; 

# Here, we apply approximants through the whole utterance, same that we did in g2p but with word boundaries between vowels.
# For example, el dado de Dabid. Between o (dado) and d (de) and "de" and "David" are the intervocalic d.
# So, as a result, it will be "el daDo De DaVid". The mayus d is the aproximant.
define RemainingApproximants 
Approximants @-> || vocal %# _ vocal ; 

# Here is a contextual character, y. That must be y griega when alone.
define PhonemeToSpelling 
TagYgriega @-> [i1 g r j e1 gh a0] || .#. _ .#. ; 

# Here, to get a better prosody of the voice and phonetic transcription, we unstress the "enta y" prefix. For example, a speaker doesn't say tréinta y cinco, but treinta y cinco, withouth stressing in the e. So, we will fix this behavior in RHVoice Spanish phonetics.
define StressedNumber 
[v|bh] [e1 j n t e0]:[e0 j n t e0]|
[t r e1 j n t a0]:[t r e0 j n t a0]|
[k w a0 r e1 n t a0]:[k w a0 r e0 n t a0]|
[c i0 n k w e1 n t a0]:[c i0 n k w e0 n t a0]|
[s e0 s e1 n t a0]:[s e0 s e0 n t a0]|
[s e0 t e1 n t a0]:[s e0 t e0 n t a0]|
[o0 ch e1 n t a0]:[o0 ch e0 n t a0]|
[n o0 bh e1 n t a0]:[n o0 bh e0 n t a0] ; 
# We will do the same, but for digits and teens.
define StressedDigit 
[u1 n]:[u0 n] | 
[d|dh] [o1 s]:[o0 s] | 
[t r e1 s]:[t r e0 s] | 
[k w a1 t r o0]:[k w a0 t r o0] | 
[c i1 n k o0]:[c i0 n k o0] | 
[s e1 j s]:[s e0 j s] | 
[s j e1 t e0]:[s j e0 t e0] | 
[o1 ch o0]:[o0 ch o0] | 
[n w e1 bh e0]:[n w e0 bh e0] ; 

define StressedDigit2 
# Here, we include the number "uno"
StressedDigit | [u1 n o0]:[u0 n o0] ; 

define StressedTeen 
[d|dh] [j e1 c]:[j e0 c] | 
[o1 n c e0]:[o0 n c e0] | 
[d|dh] [o1 c e0]:[o0 c e0] | 
[t r e1 c e0]:[t r e0 c e0] | 
[k a0 t o1 r c e0]:[k a0 t o0 r c e0] | 
[k i1 n c e0]:[k i0 n c e0] | 
[d|dh] [j e0 c i0 s e1 j s]:[j e0 c i0 s e0 j s] | 
[d|dh] [j e0 c i0 s j e1 t e0]:[j e0 c i0 s j e0 t e0] | 
[d|dh] [j e0 c j o1 ch o0]:[j e0 c j o0 ch o0] | 
[d|dh] [j e0 c i0 n w e1 bh e0]:[j e0 c i0 n w e0 bh e0] ; 

define PhoneticedDigit 
StressedDigit2 .u ; 

define PreUnstressNumber 
[u0 n]:[u1 n] @-> || WB StressedNumber .u %# i0 %# _ WB ; 

define unstressNumber 
# When treinta, cuarenta, cincuenta, etc... is in the word, accompanied by i (y) and digit (sesenta y cinco), or mil, remove the stress. For example, cuarénta y... = cuarenta y... sesénta mil... = sesenta mil...
# Note, the acute vowel it is written on purpose to show the illustration of the stress / unstress.
StressedNumber @-> || 
WB _ %# i0 %# PhoneticedDigit WB , WB _ %# [m i1 l] WB ,, 
# When (digit or ten) mil is available, such as cinco mil, the speaker doesn't say cínco mil, but cinco mil or cincomil (unstressing 5).
[StressedDigit|StressedTeen] @-> || WB _ %# [m i1 l] WB ,, 
# And, there is a special case for 20x numbers, for example "veintidós mil". We will make possible to interpret as "veintidosmíl" instead, the natural way of Spanish speakers.
StressedDigit @-> || WB [[v|bh] e1 j n t e0] | [[v|bh] e0 j n t [i0|j]] _ %# [m i1 l] WB ; 


# Contextual accentuation, AKA Sentence-Aware Prosody Modelling (SAPM) #


define MaleObjectPronoun 
# connectors: Un, el, ese, este, aquel. We will use these to conjugate and modify stress according to word context. see below.
[[u0 n] | [e0 l] | [e0 s (t) e0] | [a0 k e1 l]] ; 

# Let's define some indefinite articles for context:
define IndefiniteArticle 
# Algo, algún, ningún.
[a1 l g o0] | [a0 l g u1 n] | [n i0 n g u1 n] ; 


# Conjugate with "Hace" (ago) as a reference to something that happened in the past, a time gramaticalization.
define HaceFemeninoSingular 
[u0 n a0] ; 

define HaceFemeninoSingularAction 
# Hora, semana, década.
[o1 r a0] | [s e0 m a1 n a0] | [[d|dh] e1 k a0 dh a0] ; 

define HaceFemeninoPlural 
# Unas, algunas, muchas, muchísimas, pocas, poquísimas, tantas, tantísimas, bastantes
# Example: hace unas horas.
[u0 n a0 s] | [a0 l g u1 n a0 s] | [m u1 ch a0 s] | [m u0 ch i1 s i0 m a0 s] | [p o1 k a0 s] | [p o0 k i1 s i0 m a0 s] | [t a1 n t a0 s] | [t a0 n t i1 s i m a0 s] | [b a0 s t a1 n t e0 s] ; 

define HaceFemeninoPluralAction 
# Horas, semanas, décadas.
[HaceFemeninoSingularAction s] ; 

define HaceMasculinoSingularArticle 
# Same as female.
[u0 n] | [a0 l g u1 n] ; 

define HaceMasculinoSingularQuant 
[m u1 ch o0] | [m u0 ch i1 s i0 m o0] | [p o1 k o0] | [p o0 k i1 s i0 m o0] | [t a1 n t o0] | [t a0 n t i1 s i0 m o0] | [b a0 s t a1 n t e0] | [b a0 s t a0 n t i1 s i0 m o0] ; 

define HaceMasculinoSingular HaceMasculinoSingularArticle | HaceMasculinoSingularQuant ; 

define HaceMasculinoSingularActionTime 
# Segundo, minuto, día, mes, año, siglo, instante, momento.
# Example: hace un instante.
[s e0 gh u1 n d o0] | [m i0 n u1 t o0] | [[d|dh] i1 a0] | [m e1 s] | [a1 ni o0] | [s i1 g l o0] | [i0 n s t a1 n t e0] | [m o0 m e1 n t o0] ; 

define HaceMasculinoSingularActionCircunstance 
# tiempo, rato.
[t j e1 m p o0] | [rr a1 t o0] ; 

define HaceMasculinoSingularAction HaceMasculinoSingularActionTime | HaceMasculinoSingularActionCircunstance ; 

define HaceMasculinoPlural 
[u0 n o0 s] | [a0 l g u1 n o0 s] | [m u1 ch o0 s] | [m u0 ch i1 s i0 m o0 s] | [p o1 k o0 s] | [p o0 k i1 s i0 m o0 s] | [t a1 n t o0 s] | [t a0 n t i1 s i0 m o0 s] | [b a0 s t a1 n t e0 s] | [b a0 s t a0 n t i1 s i0 m o0 s] ; 

define HaceMasculinoPluralAction 
# To avoid confusion. This is the action that accompanies to complement.
[t j e1 m p o0 s] | [i0 n s t a1 n t e0 s] ; 

define HaceMasculinoPluralActionNumber 
# In the female context, time specifications only are definned, so has only one definition. However, in the male context, a specific definition of time indicators like these are required to follow the correct context. And the most important, I can notice gender inequality, even in the morphosyntactic aspect, not only in society.
[s e0 gh u1 n d o0 s] | [m i0 n u1 t o0 s] | [[d|dh] i1 a0 s] | [m e1 s e0 s] | [a1 ni o0 s] | [s i1 g l o0 s] ; 

define PhoneticedNumber [
	# 1 to 9, then 10 to 19
	PhoneticedDigit .u | StressedTeen .u | 
	# Twenties are a special case too. Veintiuno, veintidós, veintiocho, etc.
	[[v|bh] e0 j n t [i0|j] PhoneticedDigit] | 
	# treinta y cuatro, cuarenta y cinco, etc. Donde la decena es sin acento.
	[StressedNumber .l %# i0 %# PhoneticedDigit] | 
	# Veinte, treinta, cuarenta, cincuenta...
	StressedNumber .u
] ; 

define PersonalObjectPronoun 
# The same thing but for "mi", "tu" and "su".
[m i0] | [[s|t] u0] ; 
define Adverb 
# Adverbs like "más", "muy", "tan" and others will be used here for some stressing situations.
[m a1 s] | [m u1 j] | [t a1 n] ; 
define Adverb2 
# Mente is a special case because it is not a whole word, it is like a compound, example: realmente (real-mente)
[m e1 n t e0] ; 
# We'll define special cases for "bajo": súper bajo, recontra bajo.
define SpecialNouns [s u1 p e0 r] | [rr e0 k o1 n t r a0] ; 
# We now define first person, afirmative, condition keywords and other stuff, which be used lather in two cases.
define firstPerson [y o1] ; 
define afirmative [y a1] ; 
define condition [s i0] | [m j e0 n t r a0 s] ; 
define UniqueObject [[v|bh] o0 l u1 m e0 n] | [[g|gh] o1 l p e0] ; 
define bajoObject 
# So, we could start conjugating: Un bajo, el bajo, ese bajo, este bajo, aquel bajo, mi bajo, tu bajo, su bajo (the bass music instrument)
# But, in other side, we defined "muy" adverb. This is another sentence context for bajo. In this, we are talking of low / lower (too slow, muy bajo/tan bajo).
[b|bh] [a0 x o0]:[a1 x o0] ; 

define sobreObject 
# Un sobre, el sobre, ese sobre, este sobre, aquel sobre, mi sobre, tu sobre, su sobre (a paper object)
[s o0 b r e0]: [s o1 b r e0] ; 
# We created the context structure for "bajo", "sobre" and other future words according to sentence. Now, let's create another context to improve spanish stress, according to sentence as well.
define este [e0 s t e0]:[e1 s t e0] ; 
define esDemonstrative 
# Now, we have: esta, este, ese, esa.
[e0 s t a0]:[e1 s t a0] | este | [e0 s e0]:[e1 s e0] | [e0 s a0]:[e1 s a0] ; 

define sonDemonstrative 
# We have estas, estos, esas, esos.
[e0 s t a0 s]:[e1 s t a0 s] | [e0 s t o0 s]:[e1 s t o0 s] | [e0 s a0 s]:[e1 s a0 s] | [e0 s o0 s]:[e1 s o0 s] ; 

define singularAction 
[e1 s]|[t j e1 n e0]|[p o0 s e1 e0]|[s i0 g n i0 f i1 k a0] ; 
define pluralAction 
[s o1 n]|[t j e1 n e0 n]|[p o0 s e1 e0 n]|[s i0 g n i0 f i1 k a0 n] ; 
# We defined "es" and "son", which can be used in a different context. For example: "esta es mi casa", "este es Mateo, tu amigo", "esto es lo que hay que hacer", "estas son mis llaves", etc. In all of these cases, the demonstrative needs to be stressed, as we saw in these definitions.
define PersonalReflexivePronoun 
# Le, me, nos, te
# Required for a particular case (see below)
[[l|m|t] e0]|[n o0 s] ; 
define comer 
# This is from the verb "comer" (eat).
[k o0 m o0]:[k o1 m o0] ; 
# So, it would be: yo como, si como, mientras como. Yo como is a statement, meaning "I eat something"; si como is a condition, meaning "if I eat". We can add the "mientras" as extra word, meaning "mientras como" (while I eat).

define PastSuffix 
# This suffix will be used to identify past participle for some specific contexts.
[[a1|i1] dh o0] ; 

define PastException 
# Let's tag the defined suffix for the word "haya" as an exception. This exception means, "haya" won't be stressed if a past participle is found.
[..] @-> Past || [%# a0 y a0 Uns] _ [%# (PhWord+) PastSuffix] WB ; 
